Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 11. PERSONAL IDENTITY INFORMATION

SUBTITLE A. IDENTIFYING INFORMATION

CHAPTER 502. PROTECTION OF IDENTIFYING FINANCIAL INFORMATION

Sec. 502.001. WARNING SIGN ABOUT IDENTITY THEFT FOR RESTAURANT OR BAR EMPLOYEES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Credit card" means an identification card, plate, coupon, book, or number or any other device authorizing a designated person or bearer to obtain property or service on credit.

(2) "Debit card" means an identification card, plate, coupon, book, or number or any other device authorizing a designated person or bearer to communicate a request to an unmanned teller machine or a customer convenience terminal or to obtain property or services by debit to an account at a financial institution.

(b) This section applies only to a restaurant or bar that accepts credit cards or debit cards from customers in the ordinary course of business.

(c) A restaurant or bar owner shall display in a prominent place on the premises of the restaurant or bar a sign stating in letters at least one-half inch high: "UNDER SECTION 32.51, PENAL CODE, IT IS A STATE JAIL FELONY (PUNISHABLE BY CONFINEMENT IN A STATE JAIL FOR NOT MORE THAN TWO YEARS) TO OBTAIN, POSSESS, TRANSFER, OR USE A CUSTOMER'S DEBIT CARD OR CREDIT CARD NUMBER WITHOUT THE CUSTOMER'S CONSENT OR EFFECTIVE CONSENT."

(d) The restaurant or bar owner shall display the sign in English and in another language spoken by a substantial portion of the employees of the restaurant or bar as their familiar language.

(e) A restaurant or bar owner who fails to comply with this section commits an offense. An offense under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $25.

(f) It is a defense to prosecution under Subsection (e) that the restaurant or bar owner charged with the offense produces to the court satisfactory evidence that the person displayed the sign required by Subsection (c) not later than 48 hours after the person received a citation for an offense under Subsection (e). If the court is satisfied with the evidence produced by the person, the court shall dismiss the charge.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 319 (H.B. 2697), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 502.002. BUSINESS RECEIPT CONTAINING CREDIT CARD OR DEBIT CARD INFORMATION. (a) A person who accepts a credit card or debit card for the transaction of business may not print on a receipt or other document that evidences the transaction and is provided to a cardholder more than the last four digits of the credit card or debit card account number or the month and year that the credit card or debit card expires.

(b) This section does not apply to a transaction in which the sole means of recording a person's credit card or debit card account number on a receipt or other document evidencing the transaction is by handwriting or an imprint or copy of the credit card or debit card.

(c) A person who provides, leases, or sells a cash register or other machine used to print a receipt or other document evidencing a credit card or debit card transaction shall provide notice of the requirements of this section to the recipient, lessee, or buyer, as applicable, of the machine.

(d) A person who violates Subsection (a) is liable to this state for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $500 for each calendar month in which a violation occurs. The civil penalty may not be imposed for more than one violation that occurs in a month. The attorney general or the prosecuting attorney in the county in which the violation occurs may bring an action to recover the civil penalty imposed under this section.

(e) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state to restrain or enjoin a person from violating Subsection (a).

(f) A court may not certify an action brought under this section as a class action.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 502.003. DELIVERY OF CHECK FORM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Addressee" means a person to whom a check form is sent.

(2) "Check form" means a device for the transmission or payment of money that:

(A) is not a negotiable instrument under Section 3.104;

(B) if completed would be a check as defined by Section 3.104; and

(C) is printed with information relating to the financial institution on which the completed check may be drawn.

(3) "Check form provider" means a business that provides check forms to a customer for a personal or business account.

(4) "Courier" means an entity that delivers parcels for a fee.

(b) If an addressee requests that a check form provider employ courier delivery of a check form with signature required, and that service is available in the delivery area of the addressee, the entity arranging for courier delivery in compliance with the addressee's request must provide the addressee with the option to require that the signature of the addressee, or the representative of the addressee, be obtained on delivery.

(c) The option under Subsection (b) to require the signature of the addressee or representative may be provided:

(1) on a printed check form order form;

(2) on an electronic check form order form where check form orders are offered on the Internet;

(3) by electronic mail to an address established for that purpose by the entity making the offer; or

(4) by another method reasonably designed to effectively communicate the addressee's intent.

(d) An entity that arranges for the courier delivery of a check form to an addressee as requested under Subsection (b) shall notify the courier of the check form that the signature of the addressee or a representative of the addressee is required for delivery under that subsection.

(e) If the addressee suffers a pecuniary loss because of the use of a check form stolen at the time of delivery to the addressee, a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each delivery may be imposed on:

(1) an entity that violates Subsection (b), (c), or (d); or

(2) a courier that:

(A) is properly notified under Subsection (d) that a signature is required for delivery; and

(B) delivers the check form without obtaining the signature of the addressee or a representative of the addressee.

(f) The attorney general may bring an action to recover a civil penalty imposed under Subsection (e). The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses incurred in obtaining the civil penalty, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition expenses.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.